Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 11
ALTERNATIVES FOR MONEY PURCHASE PLAN MEMBERS

31-31-1101. Entry into the fire and police pension association defined benefit system.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective until January 1, 2023.] Any employer who has established a local money purchase plan pursuant to part 6 of this article 31 or article 30.5 of this title 31 or has withdrawn into the statewide money purchase plan pursuant to part 5 of this article 31 may apply to the board to require all new employees hired on or after a date certain who meet the definition of member as defined in section 31-31-102 (4) to participate as a group in the defined benefit system in either the statewide defined benefit plan established in part 4 of this article 31 or the statewide hybrid plan established in section 31-31-1102. An application may be initiated by filing with the board a resolution adopted by the governing body of the employer in accordance with the terms, process, certifications, and schedule established by the board.

(1)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1) is effective January 1, 2023.

]

Any employer who has established a local money purchase plan pursuant to part 6 of this article 31 or article 30.5 of this title 31 or has withdrawn into the statewide money purchase plan pursuant to part 5 of this article 31 may apply to the board to require all new employees hired on or after a date certain who meet the definition of member as defined in section 31-31-102 (4) to participate as a group in the defined benefit system in either the defined benefit component or the hybrid and money purchase components of the statewide retirement plan established in article 31.5 of this title 31. An application may be initiated by filing with the board a resolution adopted by the governing body of the employer in accordance with the terms, process, certifications, and schedule established by the board.

(1.5) An employer who has elected participation pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may also apply to cover some or all of the existing members of its money purchase plan under the defined benefit system. An application may be initiated by filing with the board a resolution adopted by the governing body of the employer in accordance with the requirements, terms, process, certifications, and schedule established by the board.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2018.)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3.5) of this section, any application for coverage under the defined benefit system pursuant to subsection (1.5) of this section shall be approved by at least sixty-five percent of all active members employed by the employer who are participating in the money purchase plan at the time of the application and who vote in the election proposing the coverage.

(3.5) (a) In lieu of an election to obtain the approval by at least sixty-five percent of all active members who vote in the election proposing the coverage as required by subsection (3) of this section, and when the local plan allows for the individual self-direction of each member's account, the employer may offer each active local plan member the option to discontinue participation in the local money purchase plan and to participate in the defined benefit system. The offer shall be extended to all active local plan members employed by the employer at the time of the offer.

Nothing contained in subsection (3.5)(a) of this section shall be construed to waive or invalidate the requirement for an election of members that may be required by a local plan document, trust agreement, or labor agreement.

The board shall promulgate rules relating to standards for disclosure of all ramifications and procedures for obtaining member approval pursuant to subsection (3) of this section or for allowing active members to join the defined benefit system pursuant to subsection (3.5) of this section. The board shall also promulgate rules relating to standards for granting an employer's application for participation in the defined benefit system and for the submission of information to the board by the employer. Such rules shall contain a provision specifying that an employer that opts to participate in the defined benefit system shall not be permitted to opt out of the elected plan at any later date.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2018.)

The board shall determine a continuing uniform rate of contribution for all members who are active on the effective date of coverage to fund the benefits payable by the fire and police pension association under the statewide defined benefit plan. The continuing rate of contribution shall be determined by the board utilizing certified actuarial reports prepared by the actuary for the plan. Any actuarial report shall also certify, in accordance with accepted actuarial principals, that the employers' coverage shall not have an adverse financial impact on the actuarial soundness of the plan. Continuing contributions for each member who is active on the effective date of coverage shall be made at the rate established on said date until the member's retirement or termination; except that the board may lower the continuing rate of contribution in the event it finds that the original continuing rate of contribution is in excess of what is required to pay the cost of benefits based on the advice of the actuary. The board may periodically adjust the rate prior to the election of coverage by an employer based on certified actuarial reports prepared by the actuary for the plan.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part added, p. 735, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2006:

(1), (2), (3), (4), (5)(c), and (6)(a) amended and (3.5) added, p. 302, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2017:

(3) and (3.5)(a) amended, (SB 17-020), ch. 23, p. 71, § 6, effective March 8.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1031), ch. 5, p. 32, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2020:

(7) amended, (HB 20-1044), ch. 105, p. 414, § 12, effective September 14.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 311, § 19, effective January 1, 2023.

31-31-1102. Statewide hybrid plan - creation - management - repeal.

The board is authorized to develop, maintain, and amend a statewide hybrid plan document that is a component of the defined benefit system and that offers a combination of defined benefit and defined contribution benefits and that is intended to comply with the qualification requirements specified in section 401 of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, that are applicable to governmental plans. The plan shall cover the members of those employers that have elected coverage under the plan pursuant to section 31-31-1101.

There is hereby created the fire and police members' statewide hybrid plan benefit account that shall be a component of the defined benefit system trust fund and that shall consist of moneys of employers that have elected coverage pursuant to section 31-31-1101, including member and employer contributions and such amounts as may be transferred pursuant to section 31-31-1101. The board shall keep an accurate account of the fund, each member's separate account in the fund, and each member's service credit earned under the statewide hybrid plan.

The statewide hybrid plan document created by the board pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall govern the accrual of service credit, vesting, the benefits to be offered based on age and service, the allocation of contributions towards funding the defined benefit and the defined contribution, the calculation and allocation of earnings and losses under the various investment alternatives which the board may offer, the transfer of assets between funds under each investment alternative, the allocation of a member's account between investment alternatives, and such other matters as may be necessary to the board's administration and management of the plan created pursuant to this section.

Defined benefit assets of the statewide hybrid plan shall be administered within the fire and police members' benefit investment fund, and self-directed assets of the plan shall be administered within the fire and police members' self-directed investment fund. In its administration, investment, and management of the defined contribution assets of the statewide hybrid plan the board shall be subject to the provisions of section 31-31-303.

Each member's member and employer contributions transferred to the statewide hybrid plan pursuant to section 31-31-1101 shall be allocated to the member's separate account within the plan.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (4), upon the effective date of coverage under the statewide hybrid plan, each member covered by the plan shall pay into the defined benefit system trust fund eight percent of salary paid. The payment shall be made by the employer by deduction from the salary paid to such member. Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (4), for each such member, the employer shall pay into the defined benefit system trust fund eight percent of the salary paid to such member. Payments are due no later than ten days following the date of payment of salary to the member. The payments required by this section are subject to interest if not submitted when due.

Upon the request of an employer, the board shall permit a higher mandatory employer contribution rate, mandatory employee contribution rate, or both, than is set forth in subsection (4)(a) of this section if the board determines that:

A local resolution or ordinance setting forth the higher mandatory contribution rate or rates was enacted and is in effect; and

An employee election was conducted and the higher mandatory contribution rate or rates was approved by sixty-five percent of the employer's active members of the plan who vote in the election proposing the coverage.

Any active member and any employer may make voluntary contributions to the statewide hybrid plan by payroll deduction. Voluntary member contributions are not subject to the employer pickup provisions of section 414 (h) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended.

In no event shall increased contributions resulting from a higher contribution rate or rates cause a member to exceed the limit on annual additions under the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, that are applicable to government plans.

Except with respect to amendments necessary to comply with state and federal law, including amendments adopted pursuant to section 31-31-204 (2.5), or amendments necessary to maintain the actuarial soundness of the statewide hybrid plan, the board may amend the plan document created pursuant to subsection (1) of this section only upon the approval of at least sixty-five percent of the active members of the plan and more than fifty percent of the employers having active members covered by the plan, each employer to be assigned one vote; except that employers having both active police and fire members in the plan shall be assigned two votes.

This section is repealed, effective January 1, 2023.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part added, p. 737, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2006:

(1), (2), (3), and (4)(a) amended, p. 199, § 27, effective March 31.

L. 2007:

(4)(a) amended, p. 275, § 4, effective August 3.

L. 2012:

(5) amended, (HB 12-1031), ch. 68, p. 237, § 5, effective August 8.

L. 2015:

(4)(a) amended, (SB 15-027), ch. 9, p. 22, § 6, effective August 5.

L. 2017:

IP(4)(b)(I) and (4)(b)(I)(B) amended, (SB 17-020), ch. 23, p. 71, § 7, effective March 8.

L. 2022:

(6) added by revision, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 312, §§ 21, 22.

31-31-1103. Entry into the statewide defined benefit plan. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part added, p. 739, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2006:

(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(d), (1)(e)(III), and (1)(f)(I) amended and (1)(c.5) added, p. 304, § 2, effective August 7.

L. 2017:

(1)(c) and (1)(c.5)(I) amended, (SB 17-020), ch. 23, p. 71, § 8, effective March 8.

L. 2018:

Entire section repealed, (HB 18-1031), ch. 5, p. 36, § 3 effective August 8.

31-31-1104. Merger into the statewide retirement plan.

On or about January 1, 2023, the assets and liabilities of the statewide hybrid plan shall merge into the statewide retirement plan created pursuant to article 31.5 of this title 31.

The statewide hybrid plan members defined benefit account assets shall be transferred to the lifetime benefits account created pursuant to part 1 of article 31.5 of this title 31.

The statewide hybrid plan aggregate money purchase accounts assets shall be transferred to the money purchase account created in part 1 of article 31.5 of this title 31.

Deferred retirement option plan account assets of the statewide hybrid plan shall be transferred to the money purchase account created in part 1 of article 31.5 of this title 31.

All remaining defined benefits and other obligations of the statewide hybrid plan payable on and after January 1, 2023, shall be paid from lifetime benefits account of the statewide retirement plan. The money purchase obligations of the statewide hybrid plan shall be transferred to and be payable from the money purchase component of the statewide retirement plan. Said obligations shall be paid pursuant to the statutory provisions and rules adopted by the board regarding the statewide retirement plan pursuant to article 31.5 of this title 31.

Participation by all members, including retirees, in the statewide hybrid plan shall terminate upon the merger of the plans and said members shall begin participation in the hybrid component and the money purchase component of the statewide retirement plan. Accumulated service credit and length of service shall be aggregated between the plans. Retirees shall receive an adjustment to their benefits based on the actuarial funding of the plan upon merger as determined by the board.

Immediately after such transfer, the affected member's accrued benefits in the statewide retirement plan shall be at least as great as the member's accrued benefits immediately before the transfer.

The merger is intended to be consistent with the requirements under section 414(h) of the internal revenue code and shall not be considered a plan termination and shall not result in a distributable event.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1034), ch. 61, p. 311, § 20, effective August 10.